Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4709.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; THRIVE FAMILY RECOVERY RESOURCES.new text end new text begin $350,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for a grant to Thrive Family Recovery Resources for a pilot program that provides family peer services, education, resource navigation, and general support for families impacted by substance use disorder. By January 20, 2027, the commissioner must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over human services that evaluates the results of the pilot program and makes recommendations for developing an ongoing grant program to provide supportive services and education for families impacted by substance use disorder. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end